Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.01, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Domestic corporation. The term "domestic" when applied to a corporation means a corporation: (1) created or organized in the United States, or under the laws of the United States or of any state, the District of Columbia, or any political subdivision of any of the foregoing but not including the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any possession of the United States; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) which qualifies as a DISC, as defined in section 992(a) of the Internal Revenue Codedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) which is incorporated in a tax haven; new text end new text begin (4) which is engaged in activity in a tax haven sufficient for the tax haven to impose a net income tax under United States constitutional standards and section 290.015, and which reports that 20 percent or more of its income is attributable to business in the tax haven; or new text end new text begin (5) which has the average of its property, payroll, and sales factors, as defined under section 290.191, within the 50 states of the United States and the District of Columbia of 20 percent or more. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5d. new text end new text begin Tax haven. new text end new text begin (a) "Tax haven" means a foreign jurisdiction that: new text end new text begin (1) has a tax regime that prevents effective exchange of information for tax purposes with other governments, on foreign-owned entities benefiting from the regime; new text end new text begin (2) does not open the details of legislative, legal, or administrative provisions relating to taxation to public scrutiny, make those details apparent, or consistently apply the jurisdiction's tax provisions among similarly situated taxpayers; new text end new text begin (3) explicitly or implicitly excludes the jurisdiction's resident taxpayers from taking advantage of the regime that benefits foreign-owned entities, or prohibits foreign-owned entities that benefit from the regime from operating in the jurisdiction's domestic market; or new text end new text begin (4) has a tax regime that is favorable for tax avoidance, based upon an overall assessment of factors, as may be determined by the commissioner, including whether the jurisdiction has a significant untaxed or nominally taxed offshore financial or services sector relative to its overall economy. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "tax regime" means a set or system of rules, laws, regulations, or practices by which taxes are imposed on any person, corporation, or entity, or on any income, property, incident, indicia, or activity under governmental authority. new text end new text begin (c) A foreign jurisdiction's designation as a tax haven under paragraph (a) does not apply to the first taxable year after the United States enters into a tax treaty or other agreement with the foreign jurisdiction that provides for prompt, obligatory, and automatic exchange of information with the United States government relevant to enforcing the provisions of federal tax laws applicable to both individuals and all corporations and other entities and the treaty or other agreement was in effect for the taxable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Global intangible low-taxed income. new text end new text begin The amount of income included under section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 37. new text end new text begin Subpart F income. new text end new text begin The amount of income included under section 951 of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0134, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Global intangible low-taxed income. new text end new text begin The amount of income included under section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0134, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Subpart F income. new text end new text begin The amount of income included under section 951 of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.17, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Unitary business principle. (a) If a trade or business conducted wholly within this state or partly within and partly without this state is part of a unitary business, the entire income of the unitary business is subject to apportionment pursuant to section 290.191. Notwithstanding subdivision 2, paragraph (c), none of the income of a unitary business is considered to be derived from any particular source and none may be allocated to a particular place except as provided by the applicable apportionment formula. The provisions of this subdivision do not apply to business income subject to subdivision 5, income of an insurance company, or income of an investment company determined under section 290.36. (b) The term "unitary business" means business activities or operations which result in a flow of value between them. The term may be applied within a single legal entity or between multiple entities and without regard to whether each entity is a sole proprietorship, a corporation, a partnership or a trust. (c) Unity is presumed whenever there is unity of ownership, operation, and use, evidenced by centralized management or executive force, centralized purchasing, advertising, accounting, or other controlled interaction, but the absence of these centralized activities will not necessarily evidence a nonunitary business. Unity is also presumed when business activities or operations are of mutual benefit, dependent upon or contributory to one another, either individually or as a group. (d) Where a business operation conducted in Minnesota is owned by a business entity that carries on business activity outside the state different in kind from that conducted within this state, and the other business is conducted entirely outside the state, it is presumed that the two business operations are unitary in nature, interrelated, connected, and interdependent unless it can be shown to the contrary. (e) Unity of ownership does not exist when two or more corporations are involved unless more than 50 percent of the voting stock of each corporation is directly or indirectly owned by a common owner or by common owners, either corporate or noncorporate, or by one or more of the member corporations of the group. For this purpose, the term "voting stock" shall include membership interests of mutual insurance holding companies formed under section 66A.40. (f)new text begin (1)new text end The net income and apportionment factors under section 290.191 or 290.20 of foreign corporations and other foreign entities, but excluding a disqualified captive insurance company, which are part of a unitary business shall not be included in the net income or the apportionment factors of the unitary businessdeleted text begin ; except thatdeleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (2) Notwithstanding clause (1),new text end the income and apportionment factors of a foreign entity, other than an entity treated as a C corporation for federal income tax purposes, that are included in the federal taxable income, as defined in section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code as amended through the date named in section 290.01, subdivision 19, of a domestic corporation, domestic entity, or individual must be included in determining net income and the factors to be used in the apportionment of net income pursuant to section 290.191 or 290.20. new text begin (3) new text end A foreign corporation or other foreign entity which is not included on a combined report and which is required to file a return under this chapter shall file on a separate return basis. new text begin (4) The legislature intends that the provisions of clause (1) and paragraph (g), clause (1), are not severable from the provisions of section 290.01, subdivision 5, clauses (2) to (5), and if any of those provisions are found to be unconstitutional, the provisions of this paragraph are void for the respective taxable years. new text end (g)new text begin (1)new text end For purposes of determining the net income of a unitary business and the factors to be used in the apportionment of net income pursuant to section 290.191 or 290.20, there must be included only the income and apportionment factors of domestic corporations or other domestic entities that are determined to be part of the unitary business pursuant to this subdivision, notwithstanding that foreign corporations or other foreign entities might be included in the unitary businessdeleted text begin ; except thatdeleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (2) Notwithstanding clause (1),new text end the income and apportionment factors of a foreign entity, other than an entity treated as a C corporation for federal income tax purposes, that is included in the federal taxable income, as defined in section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code as amended through the date named in section 290.01, subdivision 19, of a domestic corporation, domestic entity, or individual must be included in determining net income and the factors to be used in the apportionment of net income pursuant to section 290.191 or 290.20. (h) Each corporation or other entity, except a sole proprietorship, that is part of a unitary business must file combined reports as the commissioner determines. On the reports, all intercompany transactions between entities included pursuant to paragraph (g) must be eliminated and the entire net income of the unitary business determined in accordance with this subdivision is apportioned among the entities by using each entity's Minnesota factors for apportionment purposes in the numerators of the apportionment formula and the total factors for apportionment purposes of all entities included pursuant to paragraph (g) in the denominators of the apportionment formula. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (f), all sales of the unitary business made within this state pursuant to section 290.191 or 290.20 must be included on the combined report of a corporation or other entity that is a member of the unitary business and is subject to the jurisdiction of this state to impose tax under this chapter. (i) If a corporation has been divested from a unitary business and is included in a combined report for a fractional part of the common accounting period of the combined report: (1) its income includable in the combined report is its income incurred for that part of the year determined by proration or separate accounting; and (2) its sales, property, and payroll included in the apportionment formula must be prorated or accounted for separately. (j) For purposes of this subdivision, "insurance company" means an insurance company, as defined in section 290.01, subdivision 5b, that is not a disqualified captive insurance company. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.21, subdivisions 9 and 10, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-03680 290.21 DEDUCTIONS ALLOWED TO CORPORATIONS. Subd. 9. Controlled foreign corporations. The net income of a corporation that is included pursuant to section 951 of the Internal Revenue Code is dividend income. Subd. 10. Global intangible low-taxed income. Any amounts included in taxable income pursuant to section 951A of the Internal Revenue Code, are dividend income.